Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202019-5402
Legislative findings and declarations.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Vacant properties have the potential to create a host of problems for Nebraska communities, including a propensity to foster criminal activity, create public health problems, and otherwise diminish quality of life;

(2) Vacant properties have the potential to reduce the value of area properties, increase the risk of property damage through arson and vandalism, and discourage neighborhood stability;

(3) Vacant properties represent unrealized economic growth in Nebraska communities;

(4) A vacant property registration ordinance allows a municipality to discourage property vacancy, maintain unoccupied buildings, provide a data base of vacant properties and their owners, and assess fees for the increased public costs associated with vacant properties;

(5) Fees imposed under a vacant property registration ordinance have the potential to benefit the owners of vacant properties by helping to finance additional government services to protect the value and security of such properties; and

(6) Enactment of a vacant property registration ordinance is a proper exercise of governmental authority to protect the public health, safety, and welfare of community residents and a valid regulatory scheme.

Laws 2018, LB256, § 2.